Hawaii statutes.
[§712-1215.6] Promoting minor-produced
sexual images in the second degree. (1) A minor commits the offense of
promoting minor-produced sexual images in the second degree if the minor:

(a) Knowingly uses a computer, cell phone, or any
other device capable of electronic data transmission or distribution, to
transmit or distribute to another person a nude photograph or video of a minor
or the minor's self; or

(b) Intentionally or knowingly commands, requests,
or encourages another minor to use a computer, cell phone, or any other device
capable of electronic data transmission or distribution, to transmit to any
person a nude photograph or video of a minor or the minor's self.

(2) A person, of any age, commits the offense
of promoting minor-produced sexual images in the second degree if the person
knowingly possesses a nude photograph or video of a minor transmitted or
distributed in violation of subsection (1). It is an affirmative defense under
this subsection that the person took reasonable steps to destroy or eliminate
the nude photograph or video of a minor.

(3) For purposes of this section, a "minor"
means any person under eighteen years of age.

(4) Promoting minor-produced sexual images in
the second degree is a petty misdemeanor. [L 2012, c 213, pt of §1]

COMMENTARY ON §§712-1215.5 AND 712-1215.6

Act 213, Session Laws 2012, added §§712-1215.5 and 712-1215.6
to address the problem of "sexting," which involved minors taking
nude pictures and videos of themselves or other minors, and transmitting the
nude images to others by use of a cell phone or other form of electronic
communication. Specifically, Act 213 prohibited: (1) adults from soliciting
minors to electronically transmit nude images of minors by making such conduct
a misdemeanor [(§712-1215.5)]; (2) minors from electronically transmitting nude
images of themselves or other minors, or soliciting other minors to do so by
making such conduct a petty misdemeanor [(§712-1215.6)]; and (3) a person
from possessing a nude image transmitted by a minor, but making it an
affirmative defense that the recipient made reasonable efforts to destroy the
transmitted nude image [(§712-1215.6)]. The legislature found that the
electronic transmission of youth-produced sexual pictures and videos was a growing
problem, particularly because the images can be shared with many people almost
instantaneously. Once transmitted, the original transmitter had very
limited ability to control or prevent further dissemination. The legislature
further found that the images may be used as a commodity for exchange, and the
threatened dissemination of these images may be used as leverage against the
subject to force the subject to engage in behaviors that may cause
embarrassment, at minimum, and possible mental or emotional harm. Conference
Committee Report No. 25-12.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next